ja: キャンドルタイプ: CBD; 容器; フローティング; 柱; テーパー; ティーライト; ボーティブ; その他
nl: Kaarstype: CBD; Container; Drijvend; Pijler; Conus; Theelichtje; Votief; Andere
ko: 캔들 유형: CBD; 컨테이너; 플로팅; 기둥; 테이퍼; 티 라이트; 보티브; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta sveče: CBD; Posoda; Lebdeča; Stebrna; Zožena; Čajna; Votivna; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de velas: CBD; Recipiente; Flutuante; Pilar; Para castiçal; Tea light; Votiva; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta svijeće: CBD; Posuda; Plutajuća; Široka; Uska; Lučica; Molitvena; Ostalo
es: Tipo de vela: CBD; Recipiente; Flotante; Pilar; Cónica; De té; Votiva; Otros
hu: Gyertya típusa: CBD; Konténeres; Úszó; Álló; Vékony; Teamécses; Fogadalmi; Egyéb
fr: Type de bougie: CBD; Récipient; Flottant; Pilier; Cône; Bougie chauffe-plat; Votive; Autre
ru: Тип свечи: CBD; Контейнер; Плавающий; Столовая; Конус; Чайная свеча; Церковная; Другой
tr: Mum Tipi: CBD; Konteyner; Dalgalanan; Sütun; Konik; Küçük; Adak; Diğer
nb: Stearinlystype: CBD; Beholder; Flytende; Pilar; Taper; Telys; Votiv; Annet
cs: Typ svíčky: CBD; Nádoba; Plovoucí; Sloup; Kužel; Čajová svíčka; Votivní; Jiné
fi: Kynttilätyyppi: CBD; Säiliö; Kelluva; Pilari; Kartiomainen; Tuikku; Votiivi; Muu
da: Lystype: CBD; Beholder; Flydende; Søjle; Tilspidsning; Fyrfadslys; Votiv; Andet
th: ประเภทเทียน: CBD; ภาชนะบรรจุ; ลอยน้ำ; เสาหลัก; แท่งเรียว; ทีไลท์; โวทีฟ; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ świecy: CBD; Kontener; Pływająca; Filar; Stożek; Podgrzewacza; Wotywna; Inne
zh-TW: 蠟燭類型: 大麻二酚 (CBD); 容器; 漂浮的; 柱子; 瘦長型柱狀; 茶燈; 奉獻; 其他
sk-SK: Typ sviečky: CBD; Kontajner; Plávajúci; Pilier; Kužeľ; Čajová sviečka; Votívny; Iné
sv: Ljustyp: CBD; Behållare; Flytande; Pelare; Avsmalnande; Värmeljus; Votiv; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип свещ: CBD; Контейнер; Плаващa; Стълб; Конус; Чаена светлина; Църковна; Други
ro-RO: Tip lumânare: CBD; Recipient; Plutitoare; Pilon; Cu formă conică; Pastilă; Votivă; Altele
vi: Loại nến: CBD; Thùng; Đầu nổi; Cột đỡ; Dây nến; Nến cốc; Nến thờ; Khác
lt-LT: Žvakės tipas: Kanabinoidai; Talpoje; Plaukiojanti; Pailga; Smailėjanti; Arbatinė žvakė; Liturginė; Kita
el: Τύπος κεριού: CBD; Δοχείο; Που επιπλέει; Στύλος; Λαμπάδα; Ρεσό; Αναθηματικό; Άλλο
zh-CN: 蜡烛类型: 大麻二酚; 货柜; 漂浮蜡烛; 柱子; 锥形蜡烛; 小型蜡烛; 许愿烛; 其他
it: Tipo di candela: CBD; Contenitore; Galleggiante; Pilastro; Conicità; Candelina; Votivo; Altro
en: Candle type: CBD; Container; Floating; Pillar; Taper; Tea light; Votive; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de vela: CBD; Recipiente; Flutuante; Pilar; Cônicas; Tea light; Votiva; Outro
de: Kerzentyp: CBD; Behälter; Schwebend; Säule; Konisch; Teelicht; Votiv; Sonstiges